Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.120

Fees.

A fee of fifty dollars shall be paid by all initiators and in addition if the jurisdiction of the review board is invoked pursuant to RCW 36.93.100, the person or entity seeking review, except for the boundary review board itself, shall pay to the county treasurer and place in the county current expense fund the fee of two hundred dollars.

[ 1987 c 477 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 111 s 6; 1967 c 189 s 12.]